District of Columbia statutes.
50-2421.08

Vehicle reclamation periods.

(a)

An impounded vehicle removed from public or private property pursuant to this subchapter shall be reclaimed within 28 days after the impoundment notice sent pursuant to § 50-2421.07(b).

(b)

All other vehicles impounded pursuant to this subchapter, or pursuant to any other law or regulation, shall be reclaimed within 28 days after the date of the impoundment notice sent pursuant to § 50-2421.07(b).

(c)

If the address of the owner and lienholders of an impounded vehicle is unknown, the vehicle shall be reclaimed within 14 days after the publication date of reclamation notices published pursuant to § 50-2421.07(d).

Oct 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-35, § 8, 50 DCR 6579
This section is referenced in § 22-2724 and § 50-2421.02.
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 8 of Removal and Disposition of Abandoned and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-171, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9163).